Utah statutes.
36-10-1.   Enacting clause.

The enacting clause of every law passed by the Legislature shall be: "Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Utah." The enacting clause of every law passed by the vote of the people as provided in Article VI, Section 1, of the Constitution of Utah shall be: "Be it enacted by the People of the State of Utah."

